California, session 20252026, AB1063.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 125003 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:125003. (a) The department may release a physical blood test taken from a newborn to law enforcement in response to a search warrant only if the objective of the warrant is to obtain the DNA of a missing person suspected to be a victim of homicide, child abuse resulting in death, or manslaughter in order to compare the DNA to other samples in the Department of Justice Missing Persons DNA Database and to upload the sample for future identification of the person.(b) Law enforcement shall not request or obtain a search warrant for the physical blood test taken from a newborn for any reason not described in subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, for any of the following purposes:(1) To determine whether a person is a suspect in a crime.(2) To create a DNA database of suspects or nonsuspects.(3) To establish the guilt of a person.SEC. 2. Section 125010 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:125010. Commencing July 1, 2026, and each July 1 thereafter, the State Department of Public Health shall generate a report that includes each of the following:(a) The total number of any residual screening specimens stored by the California Biobank Program.(b) The number of new residual screening specimens collected during the previous calendar year.(c) The number of inheritable conditions identified by the original screening tests during the previous calendar year.(d) The number of projects utilizing specimens from the California Biobank Program.(e) The number of published research studies where biospecimens from the California Biobank Program were used or referenced and the potential public health benefits from the research.(f) The number of specimens provided by the California Biobank Program for each research project.(g) The number of screening tests waived for religious purposes during the previous calendar year.(h) The number of residual screening specimens destroyed at the request of a parent or adult during the previous calendar year.(i) The number of residual screening samples remaining to be destroyed at the request of a parent or adult during the previous calendar year.(j) The number of search warrants received by the California Biobank Program during the previous calendar year as described in Section 125003.(k) The number of disclosures granted by the California Biobank Program pursuant to a search warrant during the previous calendar year as described in Section 125003.